Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF448.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 2554SV (1) 91 th/ns S.F. 448 Section 1. Section 321.376, subsections 1 and 3, Code 2025, 1 are amended to read as follows: 2 1. a. The driver of a school bus shall hold a driverâs 3 license issued by the department of transportation valid 4 for the operation of the school bus and a certificate of 5 qualification for operation of a commercial motor vehicle 6 issued by a physician or osteopathic physician licensed 7 pursuant to chapter 148 , physician assistant, advanced 8 registered nurse practitioner, or chiropractor or any other 9 person identified by federal and state law as authorized to 10 perform physical examinations , and . 11 b. If required by the school district employing the driver, 12 the driver shall successfully complete an approved course of 13 instruction in accordance with subsection 3 . 14 c. A person holding a temporary restricted license issued 15 under chapter 321J shall be prohibited from operating a school 16 bus. 17 3. a. A person applying for employment or employed as 18 a school bus driver shall not be required to successfully 19 complete a department of education approved course of 20 instruction for school bus drivers unless the school district 21 hiring or employing the person requires successful completion 22 of such course. 23 b. If a school district requires successful completion of an 24 approved course, the person hired as a school bus driver shall 25 complete the course before or within the first six months of 26 employment and at least every twenty-four months thereafter. 27 If an employee is required to complete a course and fails to 28 provide an employer with a certificate of completion of the 29 required school bus driverâs course, the driverâs employer 30 shall report the failure to the department of education and 31 the employeeâs authorization to operate a school bus shall be 32 revoked. The department of education shall send notice of the 33 revocation to both the employee and the employer. A person 34 whose school bus authorization has been revoked under this 35 -1- LSB 2554SV (1) 91 th/ns 1/ 2 S.F. 448 section subsection shall not be issued another authorization 1 until certification of the completion of an approved school bus 2 driverâs course is received by the department of education , or 3 until the person is employed by a school district that does not 4 require successful completion of an approved course and the 5 person is otherwise in compliance with this section . 6